Montana, session 2025, SB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Attorney trust account interest. With the client’s written consent, a
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 31

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 31.1
lawyer may deposit a client’s money in:
(1) a non-interest-bearing trust account;
(2) an interest-bearing trust account in which the client's funds earn interest that belongs to the
client, in which case the lawyer shall remit the client’s interest income to the client at reasonable intervals of
time; or
(3) a trust account subject to the Montana supreme court's interest on lawyer trust accounts
program, through which the interest is paid to an organization of the Montana supreme court's choosing.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 37, chapter 61, part 4, and the provisions of Title 37, chapter 61, part 4, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 31